Massachusetts, session 194th, S3014.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 35WW of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “62”, in line 17, the following
words:- , fines collected pursuant to section 37 of chapter 129.
SECTION 2. Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting following
new section:-
Section 37. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term “pet” shall mean any
domesticated animal that is commonly kept in a household.
(b) The executive office of housing and livable communities shall establish a program of
pet ownership for residents of state-aided public housing for: (i) the elderly; and (ii) residents
who are able to reasonably care for a pet, in accordance with all applicable public health, animal
control animal-cruelty laws and regulations and the reasonable requirements of the state-aided
public housing; provided, however, that reasonable requirements may include, but shall not be
limited to: (i) requiring a pet deposit which shall be the lesser of $160 or one month’s rent; (ii)
of 8

limitations on the number of pets permitted in a unit, based on unit size; (iii) restrictions or
prohibitions based on size and type of building, project or unit; (iv) a requirement that pets be
spayed or neutered; (v) a requirement that a tenant maintain an adequate care plan for the pet,
including veterinarian care and designation of an emergency contact that can care for the pet in
the event the tenant is unable to do so; (vi) a requirement that the pet be registered with the state-
aided public housing facility; and (vii) any other requirements deemed necessary or appropriate
by the executive office of housing and livable communities.
(c) No state-aided public housing facility shall: (i) impose an outright prohibition on the
keeping of pets by tenants; (ii) discriminate solely based on a pet’s breed, size, weight or
appearance; (iii) require pet declawing as a condition of allowing a pet on the premises; or (iv)
evict a tenant based solely on the presence of a pet, where such tenant has otherwise adhered to
the facility’s requirements and policies pursuant to this section.
(d) Nothing in this section shall require a state-aided housing facility to allow for the
keeping of a dog that has been declared dangerous by a municipality pursuant to section 157 of
chapter 140 or has a known history of biting or injuring a person or domestic animal.
(e) The executive office of housing and livable communities shall promulgate regulations
to implement this section; provided, however, that the executive office shall consult with local
housing authorities and local tenant organizations in state-aided public housing in developing
said regulations.
SECTION 3. Section 37 of chapter 129 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth sentence the following
of 8

sentence:- A fine assessed under this section shall be deposited into the Homeless Animal
Prevention and Care Fund established in section 35WW of chapter 10.
SECTION 4. Section 39A of said chapter 129, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 1, the word “Every” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- (a)
Every.
SECTION 5. Said section 39A of said chapter 129, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 13, the word “section”, and inserting in place thereof the
following word:- subsection.
SECTION 6. Said section 39A of said chapter 129 is hereby further amended by inserting
the following 2 subsections:-
(b) No person engaged in the business of operating a pet shop for which a license must be
obtained pursuant to subsection (a) shall sell or offer for sale a dog or cat; provided, however,
that a pet shop may offer space to an animal rescue or shelter organization to showcase dogs or
cats for adoption if said pet shop has no ownership interest in the animals offered for adoption.
(c) Notwithstanding section 43 of this chapter, a person who violates subsection (b) of
this section shall be: (i) assessed a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for the first offense, not
more than $2,500 for the second offense and not more than $5,000 for the third and subsequent
offenses; and (ii) subject to suspension or revocation of the person’s pet shop license. Each
advertisement or offer for sale or actual sale of a dog or cat in violation of subsection (b) shall
constitute a separate violation.
of 8

SECTION 7. Section 174E of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended striking out subsections (f) and (g) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsections:-
(f) No person owning or keeping a household pet shall subject such pet to cruel
conditions.
For the purposes of this subsection, “cruel conditions” shall include, but shall not be
limited to, the following:
(i) exposure to excessive animal waste, garbage, non-potable water, excessive noxious
odors that create a health threat to people or animals, dangerous objects or other animals that
could injure or kill an animal upon contact, other circumstances that could cause harm to the
health or safety of the animal based on species, age or physical condition; or failure to provide
access to appropriate food and water based on the animal’s species, age or physical condition;
and
(ii) lack of protection when wind or environmental or weather conditions pose an adverse
risk to the health or safety of the animal based on the animal’s species, age or physical condition.
(g) A person who violates this section shall: (i) for a first offense, be issued a written
warning or punished by a fine of not more than $50; (ii) for a second offense, be punished by a
fine of not more than $200; and (iii) for a third or subsequent offense, be punished by a fine of
not more than $500; provided, however, that for a third or subsequent offense, the animal may be
subject to impoundment in a local shelter or appropriate facility at the owner’s, keeper’s or
guardian’s expense pending compliance with this section or the owner, keeper or guardian may
lose ownership of the animal.
of 8

SECTION 8. Said section 174E of said chapter 140, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “special”, in line 100, the following word:- state.
SECTION 9. Said section 174E of said chapter 140, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 102, the word “and” and inserting in place thereof the following
word:- or.
SECTION 10. Said section 174E of said chapter 140, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(j) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution pursuant to section 77 of chapter
272.
SECTION 11. Said chapter 140 is hereby further amended by inserting after section
174H the following section:-
Section 174I.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Alternative test method”, a process or procedure, implemented to obtain information
regarding the biological effects of exposure to a chemical or agent, that does not employ the use
of an animal and results in the gathering of information that would otherwise be acquired
through the use of a traditional animal test method, including, but not limited to, computational
toxicology, bioinformatics, high-throughput screening methods, chemical substances testing,
tiered testing methods, in vitro studies and systems biology.
“Animal”, a vertebrate nonhuman animal.
of 8

“Commissioner”, the commissioner of the department of public health.
“Contract testing facility”, a partnership, corporation, association or other legal entity that
100 tests chemicals, ingredients, product formulations or products.
101 “Manufacturer”, a partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity that
102 produces products, product formulations, chemicals or ingredients.
103 “Medical research”, investigations, experiments or studies to discover, develop or verify
104 knowledge relating to the causes, diagnosis, treatment, prevention or control of physical or
105 mental diseases and impairments of humans or animals or relating to the development of
106 biomedical products, devices or pharmaceuticals.
107 “Traditional animal test method”, a process or procedure using animals to obtain
108 information regarding the biological effects of exposure to a chemical or agent.
109 (b) No manufacturer or contract testing facility shall use a traditional animal test method
110 for which a valid alternative test method exists when testing a cosmetic or household product,
111 product formulation, chemical or ingredient in the commonwealth.
112 (c) The commissioner shall promulgate regulations to implement, enforce and administer
113 this section and shall establish standards for alternative test methods to ensure safety and
114 comparable validity of results to traditional animal test methods. The commissioner shall
115 consider the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development’s guidelines for the
116 testing of chemicals when establishing said standards.
117 (d) This section shall not apply to a test method conducted for the purposes of medical
118 research.
of 8

119 SECTION 12. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
120 section 4C the following section:-
121 Section 4C1/2. (a) No insurer licensed to write and engaged in the writing of
122 homeowners insurance in the commonwealth nor the joint underwriting association, formed
123 under chapter 175C, shall, when deciding whether to provide, renew or cancel a homeowner’s
124 policy, or when establishing the premium for such policy, take into consideration the breed or
125 mixture of breeds of any dog kept on the insured property. No such insurer or joint underwriting
126 association shall inquire of an applicant or insured about the breed or mixture of breeds of a dog
127 kept on the insured’s property; provided, however, that an insurer or joint underwriting
128 association may inquire whether any such dog has been declared dangerous by a municipality
129 pursuant to section 157 of chapter 140 or has a known history of biting or injuring a person or
130 domestic animal.
131 (b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer or joint underwriting association from
132 taking into consideration whether any such dog has been declared dangerous by a municipality
133 pursuant to section 157 of chapter 140, or has a known history of biting or injuring a person or
134 domestic animal when making any underwriting or rating decision.
135 SECTION 13. The executive office of housing and livable communities shall conduct a
136 study and develop recommendations regarding the prevalence and effects of pet-related fees
137 charged to residents of state-aided and privately-owned rental housing in the commonwealth.
138 The study shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the prevalence and range of such pet-related fee
139 practices among state-aided and privately-owned rental housing providers in the commonwealth;
140 (ii) the effects of such pet-related fees on housing stability and access for pet-owning
of 8

141 households, including households in state-aided public housing; (iii) the relationship between
142 such pet-related fees and rates of pet relinquishment to animal shelters in the commonwealth;
143 (iv) existing fee or security deposit limitations or prohibitions on pet ownership for tenants in
144 other states and their effects on housing access, animal shelter intake and landlord practices; and
145 (v) any other information deemed relevant by the executive office. For the purposes of this study,
146 the term “pet” shall mean any domesticated animal that is commonly kept in a household.
147 Not later than December 31, 2027, the executive office shall publish the results of the
148 study on its website and submit a copy to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives
149 and to the joint committee on housing.
150 SECTION 14. Sections 4, 5 and 6 shall take effect 180 days after the passage of this act.
151 SECTION 15. The commissioner of public health shall promulgate regulations to
152 implement section 174I of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as inserted by section 11, not more
153 than 180 days following passage of this act.
of 8